Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,318
Equipment on bicycles; lights; brakes.

(1) When in use at nighttime, a bicycle shall be equipped with a light visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the front on a clear night and with a red reflector on the rear of a type which is approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles or a local authority and which is visible on a clear night from all distances between one hundred feet and six hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlights on a motor vehicle. A red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear may be used in addition to such red reflector.

(2) Any bicycle used on a highway shall be equipped with a brake or brakes which will enable the operator to stop the bicycle within twenty-five feet of the point of braking when moving at a speed of ten miles per hour on dry, level, clean pavement.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 91;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-691;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 414;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 21.